Utah statutes.
53-10-212.   Supplies and equipment for compliance by reporting agencies.

All governing boards or commissions of each city, town, county, or correctional institution of the state shall furnish the appropriate officials with supplies and equipment necessary to perform the duties prescribed in this part.

